Maine, session 132, LD413.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 33 MRSA §173, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 602, §5 and reallocated
by RR 2023, c. 2, Pt. A, §52, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
8. Shoreland zoning ordinance. Detailed information on any of the following related
to a shoreland zoning ordinance adopted pursuant to Title 38, chapter 3, subchapter 1,
article 2-B:
A. A notice of violation issued by a municipal official or state agency;
B. A pending enforcement action;
C. Litigation;
D. A court judgment; and
E. A settlement or consent agreement.
Page 1 - 132LR0917(03)